Washington statutes.
RCW 18.210.060

Board—Authority—Duties.

The board may:

(1) Adopt rules to implement this chapter including, but not limited to, evaluation of experience, examinations, and scope and standards of practice;

(2) Administer licensing examinations; and

(3) Review and approve or deny initial and renewal license applications.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 78; 2002 c 86 s 258; 1999 c 263 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.